Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.280

Action for damages—Costs, attorneys' fees—No limitation of consumer protection act.

In addition to any other penalties or remedies under chapter 19.86 RCW, a person who is injured by a violation of this chapter may bring an action for recovery of actual damages, including court costs and attorneys' fees. No provision in this chapter shall be construed to limit any right or remedy provided under chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 1994 c 237 s 28.]